Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General
§ 19-5-21.
Levy of ad valorem taxes and surcharges for payment of costs of establishment and operation of garbage and rubbish disposal systems; borrowing in anticipation of surcharge levy; use of special funds.

Except as provided in paragraphs (b), (c), (d) and (g) of this subsection, the board of supervisors, to defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 19-5-17, may levy an ad valorem tax not to exceed four (4) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system. The service area may be comprised of unincorporated or incorporated areas of the county or both; however, no property shall be subject to this levy unless that property is within an area served by a county’s garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system.

The board of supervisors of any county wherein Mississippi Highways 35 and 16 intersect and having a land area of five hundred eighty-six (586) square miles may levy, in its discretion, for the purposes of establishing, operating and maintaining a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system, an ad valorem tax not to exceed six (6) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the system as set out in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Mississippi River and traversed by U.S. Highway 61, and which is intersected by Mississippi Highway 4, having a population of eleven thousand eight hundred fifty-four (11,854) according to the 1970 federal census, and having an assessed valuation of Fourteen Million Eight Hundred Seventy-two Thousand One Hundred Forty-four Dollars ($14,872,144.00) in 1970, may levy, in its discretion, for the purposes of establishing, operating and maintaining a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system, an ad valorem tax not to exceed six (6) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the system as set out in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The board of supervisors of any county having a population in excess of two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the latest federal decennial census, and in which Interstate Highway 55 and Interstate Highway 20 intersect, may levy, in its discretion, for the purposes of establishing, operating and maintaining a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system, an ad valorem tax not to exceed seven (7) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the system as set out in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The proceeds derived from any additional millage levied pursuant to paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection in excess of two (2) mills shall be excluded from the ten percent (10%) increase limitation under Section 27-39-321 for the first year of such additional levy and shall be included within such limitation in any year thereafter. The proceeds from any millage levied pursuant to paragraph (g) shall be excluded from the ten percent (10%) increase limitation under Section 27-39-321 for the first year of the levy and shall be included within the limitation in any year thereafter.

The rate of the ad valorem tax levied under this section shall be shown as a line item on the notice of ad valorem taxes on taxable property owed by the taxpayer.

In lieu of the ad valorem tax authorized in paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection, the fees authorized in subsection (2) of this subsection and in Section 19-5-17 or any combination thereof, the board of supervisors may levy an ad valorem tax not to exceed six (6) mills to defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 19-5-17 on all taxable property within the area served by the system as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Any board of supervisors levying the ad valorem tax authorized in this paragraph (g) is prohibited from assessing or collecting fees for the services provided under the system.

In addition to the ad valorem taxes authorized in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection (1) or in lieu of any other method authorized to defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 19-5-17, the board of supervisors of any county with a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system may assess and collect fees to defray the costs of the services. The board of supervisors may assess and collect the fees from each single family residential generator of garbage or rubbish. The board of supervisors also may assess and collect the fees from each industrial, commercial and multifamily residential generator of garbage or rubbish for any time period that the generator has not contracted for the collection of garbage and rubbish that is ultimately disposed of at a permitted or authorized nonhazardous solid waste management facility. The fees assessed and collected under this subsection may not exceed, when added to the proceeds derived from any ad valorem tax imposed under this section and any special funds authorized under subsection (7), the actual costs estimated to be incurred by the county in operating the county garbage and rubbish collection and disposal system. In addition to such fees, an additional amount not to exceed up to One Dollar ($1.00) or ten percent (10%) per month, whichever is greater, on the current monthly bill may be assessed and collected on the balance of any delinquent monthly fees.

Before the adoption of any order to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees authorized by this section, the board of supervisors shall publish a notice advertising their intent to adopt an order to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees authorized by this section. The notice shall specify the purpose of the proposed increase, the proposed percentage increase and the proposed percentage increase in total revenues for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal services or shall contain a copy of the resolution by the board stating their intent to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees. The notice shall be published in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the county for no less than three (3) consecutive weeks before the adoption of the order. The notice shall be in print no less than the size of eighteen (18) point and shall be surrounded by a one-fourth (1/4) inch black border. The notice shall not be placed in the legal section notice of the newspaper. There shall be no language in the notice stating or implying a mandate from the Legislature.

In addition to the requirement for publication of notice, the board of supervisors shall notify each person furnished garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service of any increase in the ad valorem tax assessment or fees. In the case of an increase of the ad valorem tax assessment, a notice shall be conspicuously placed on or attached to the first ad valorem tax bill on which the increased assessment is effective. In the case of an increase in fees, a notice shall be conspicuously placed on or attached to the first bill for fees on which the increased fees or charges are assessed. There shall be no language in any notice stating or implying a mandate from the Legislature.

The board of supervisors of each county shall adopt an order determining whether or not to grant exemptions, either full or partial, from the fees for certain classes of generators of garbage or rubbish. If a board of supervisors grants any exemption, it shall do so in accordance with policies and procedures, duly adopted and entered on its minutes, that clearly define those classes of generators to whom the exemptions are applicable. The order granting exemptions shall be interpreted consistently by the board when determining whether to grant or withhold requested exemptions.

The board of supervisors in any county with a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system only for residents in unincorporated areas may adopt an order authorizing any single family generator to elect not to use the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system. If the board of supervisors adopts an order, the head of any single family residential generator may elect not to use the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service by filing with the chancery clerk the form provided for in this subsection before December 1 of each year. The board of supervisors shall develop a form that shall be available in the office of the chancery clerk for the head of household to elect not to use the service and to accept full responsibility for the disposal of his garbage or rubbish in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations. The board of supervisors, following consultation with the Department of Environmental Quality, shall develop and the chancery clerk shall provide a form to each person electing not to use the service describing penalties under state and federal law and regulations for improper or unauthorized management of garbage. Notice that the election may be made not to use the county service by filing the form with the chancery clerk’s office shall be published in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the county for no less than three (3) consecutive weeks, with the first publication being made no sooner than five (5) weeks before the first day of December. The notice shall state that any single family residential generator may elect not to use the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service by the completion and filing of the form for that purpose with the chancery clerk’s office before December 1 of that year. The notice shall also include a statement that any single family residential generator who does not timely file the form shall be assessed any fees levied to cover the cost of the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service. The chancery clerk shall maintain a list showing the name and address of each person who has filed a notice of intent not to use the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service.

If the homestead property of a person lies partially within the unincorporated service area of a county and partially within the incorporated service area of a municipality and both the municipality and the county provide garbage collection and disposal service to that person, then the person may elect to use either garbage collection and disposal service. The person shall notify the clerk of the governing authority of the local government whose garbage collection and disposal service he elects not to use of his decision not to use such services by certified mail, return receipt requested. The person shall not be liable for any fees or charges from the service he elects not to use.

The board may borrow money for the purposes of defraying the expenses of the system in anticipation of:

The tax levy authorized under this section;

Revenues resulting from the assessment of any fees for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal; or

Any combination thereof.

In addition to the fees or ad valorem millage authorized under this section, a board of supervisors may use monies from any special funds of the county that are not otherwise required by law to be dedicated for use for a particular purpose in order to defray the costs of the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2912.7-02; Laws, 1971, ch. 370, § 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 507, § 14; Laws, 1990, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 28; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 13; Laws, 1994, ch. 624, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2017).

§ 19-5-22.
Assessment of fees and charges; joint and several liability of generator and property owner; notice; liens; discharge of liens; levy of garbage fees as special assessment against property in lieu of lien.

Fees for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal shall be assessed jointly and severally against the generator of the garbage or rubbish and against the owner of the property furnished the service. In addition to such fees, an additional amount not to exceed up to One Dollar ($1.00) or ten percent (10%) per month, whichever is greater, on the current monthly bill may be assessed on the balance of any delinquent monthly fees. Any person who pays, as a part of a rental or lease agreement, an amount for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal services shall not be held liable upon the failure of the property owner to pay those fees.

Every generator assessed the fees authorized by Section 19-5-21 and the owner of the property occupied by that generator shall be jointly and severally liable for the fees. The fees shall be a lien upon the real property offered garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service.

The board of supervisors may assess the fees annually. If the fees are assessed annually, the fees for each calendar year shall be a lien upon the real property beginning on January 1 of the next immediately succeeding calendar year. The person or entity owing the fees, upon signing a form provided by the board of supervisors, may pay the fees in equal installments.

If fees are assessed on a basis other than annually, the fees shall become a lien on the real property offered the service on the date that the fees become due and payable.

No real or personal property shall be sold to satisfy any lien imposed under this subsection (2).

The county shall mail a notice of the lien, including the amount of unpaid fees and a description of the property subject to the lien, to the owner of the property.

Liens created under subsection (2) may be discharged by filing with the circuit clerk a receipt or acknowledgement, signed by the designated county official or billing and collection entity, that the lien has been paid or discharged.

The board of supervisors may notify the tax collector of any unpaid fees assessed under Section 19-5-21 within ninety (90) days after the fees are due. Before notifying the tax collector, the board of supervisors shall provide notice of the delinquency to the person who owes the delinquent fees and shall afford an opportunity for a hearing, that complies with the due process protections the board deems necessary, consistent with the Constitutions of the United States and the State of Mississippi. The board of supervisors shall establish procedures for the manner in which notice shall be given and the contents of the notice; however, each notice shall include the amount of fees and shall prescribe the procedure required for payment of the delinquent fees. The board of supervisors may designate a disinterested individual to serve as hearing officer.

Upon receipt of a delinquency notice, the tax collector shall not issue or renew a motor vehicle road and bridge privilege license for any motor vehicle owned by a person who is delinquent in the payment of fees unless those fees in addition to any other taxes or fees assessed against the motor vehicle are paid. Payment of all delinquent garbage fees shall be deemed a condition of receiving a motor vehicle road and privilege license tag.

The tax collector may forward the motor vehicle road and privilege license tag renewal notices to the designated county official or entity that is responsible for the billing and collection of the county garbage fees. The designated county official or the billing and collection entity shall identify those license tags that shall not be issued due to delinquent garbage fees. The designated county official or the billing and collection entity shall stamp a message on the license tag renewal notices that the tag will not be renewed until delinquent garbage fees are paid. The designated county official or the billing and collection entity shall return the license tag notices to the tax collector before the first of the month.

Any appeal from a decision of the board of supervisors under this section regarding payment of delinquent garbage fees may be taken as provided in Section 11-51-75.

The board of supervisors may levy the garbage fees as a special assessment against the property in lieu of the lien authorized in this section. The board of supervisors shall certify to the tax collector the assessment due from the owner of the property. The tax collector shall enter the assessment upon the annual tax roll of the county and shall collect the assessment at the same time he collects the county ad valorem taxes on the property.

No real or personal property shall be sold to satisfy any assessment imposed under this subsection (5).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 624, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 536, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 410, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2017).

§ 19-5-23.
Notice of tax levy; protest; election.

The tax levy authorized by Section 19-5-21 shall not be imposed until the board of supervisors shall have published notice of its intention to levy same. Said notice shall be published once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county, but not less than twenty-one (21) days, nor more than sixty (60) days, intervening between the time of the first notice and the meeting at which said board proposes to levy such tax. If, within the time of giving notice, twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the district affected shall protest or file a petition against the levy of such tax, then such tax shall not be levied unless authorized by a majority of the qualified electors of such district voting at an election to be called and held for that purpose. The notice provided for herein shall only be required prior to the initial levy except when the board of supervisors intends to increase the levy over the amount shown in the initial notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2912.7-03; Laws, 1971, ch. 370, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 367, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1976).

§ 19-5-25.
Reimbursement of tax levies.

The levies made under Section 19-5-21 shall not be reimbursed under the Homestead Exemption Law of 1946, being Sections 37-57-3 and 37-57-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, and any other statute authorizing the levy of taxes for the support of schools.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2912.7-06; Laws, 1971, ch. 370, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1971).

§ 19-5-27.
Supplementary method for garbage and rubbish removal.

Sections 19-5-18 through 19-5-27 provide counties a supplementary method for handling garbage and rubbish removal. These sections do not amend or repeal Section 19-5-17, Sections 17-5-3 through 17-5-11, or any other law relating to the subject, including any special or local law which may have been enacted or which may hereafter be enacted by the Legislature regarding payment of costs for garbage or rubbish removal or collection of delinquent fees assessed for garbage or rubbish removal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2912.7-05; Laws, 1971, ch. 370, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 423, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1997).

§ 19-5-29.
Payment for laying certain water mains.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties of this state may, in their discretion, pay such part of the cost of labor and material for laying water mains from municipal water systems along the highways outside the corporate limits of such municipalities, not exceeding a distance of five miles, as in their discretion, may be to the public interest of their respective counties. Such expenditure on the part of a board of supervisors shall not exceed one-half of the entire total cost of labor and material for laying such water main.

However, no part of said expense is to be borne by any board of supervisors unless there is situate on the route of such proposed water main one or more county schools.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 289; 1942, § 2993; Laws, 1926, ch. 203.

§ 19-5-30.
Payment for relocating water lines.

The board of supervisors of any county in this state is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to render any assistance deemed necessary in order to defray the cost of the relocation of a water line operated within the county by a local water association when such relocation is required for the development of a public road or other county improvement. Such assistance may be rendered by the board upon a finding that such would be in the best interest of the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 313, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 1985).

§ 19-5-31.
Golden Age Nursing Homes; establishment and operation.

The board of supervisors of each county in the state, acting alone or in conjunction with boards of supervisors of an adjoining county or counties, shall have the power and jurisdiction necessary and proper to provide for the relief and support of the aged bona fide residents of said county or counties, of good moral character and over sixty-five years of age, and, to that end, may purchase the necessary lands for the establishment of a Golden Age Nursing Home in said county or counties, and may employ suitable persons to control and operate same and to see that such aged persons are properly treated, and may provide physicians and nurses in such cases as it may deem proper, and purchase the necessary medicines and medical supplies and pay for all of same out of the general fund of said county or counties, or out of any funds ensuing from any levy made by such board of supervisors for the support and maintenance of such institutions.

The board of supervisors of said county or counties may prescribe such rules and regulations as it may deem expedient and necessary for the operation and maintenance of said county nursing home, and may employ any person as superintendent or other employees that may be required and necessary in the operation of such institution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 2998.7-01, 2998.7-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 403, §§ 1, 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 19-5-33.
Golden Age Nursing Homes; land, buildings and equipment for institution.

The board of supervisors of such county or counties may purchase in the name of such county or counties such lands as may be necessary for such institution, or may use such lands available which already belong to the board of supervisors, and may have such buildings erected thereon and equipment installed therein as may be necessary, after advertising therefor as the law directs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 403, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 19-5-35.
Golden Age Nursing Homes; combined institution for care of county paupers and destitute aged.

The board of supervisors of such county or counties may, when deemed proper, combine and use any property now being used for county homes and use such property hereafter as a combined institution to take care of the county paupers and the destitute aged provided for in Section 19-5-31 through 19-5-39, in which event the Golden Age Home may take care of all such persons.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 403, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 19-5-37.
Golden Age Nursing Homes; funds for support and maintenance.

The board of supervisors of such county or counties may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the support and maintenance of such nursing homes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 403, § 5; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 5, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-5-39.
Golden Age Nursing Homes; issuance of bonds.

The board of supervisors of any county or counties coming within the provisions of Section 19-5-31 through 19-5-39 may issue and sell its full faith and credit bonds as otherwise provided by law to secure funds with which to construct and equip such Golden Age Nursing Homes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 403, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 19-5-41.
Creation of county hospital building commission in certain counties.

The board of supervisors of any county in the state having a population of more than one hundred thousand, according to the federal census of 1950, is authorized to create a county hospital building commission with authority to advise and assist such board of supervisors in all phases of the establishment of a county hospital, including, but not limited to, land acquisition, and the planning, constructing and staffing of such hospital.

The commission herein authorized shall consist of not more than seven members, one of whom shall be from each of the supervisors districts in such county, and two of whom shall be selected from the county at large, and the board of supervisors may pay to each of the members of said commission the sum of Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per day while attending to the duties in connection with the work of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3002.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 243, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1962).

§ 19-5-43.
Temporary care and maintenance of individuals with mental illness who are unable to pay for care.

The boards of supervisors in their respective counties shall temporarily provide for the care and maintenance of any person alleged to have mental illness when the person has no means of paying that expense, pending an investigation into the mental status of the person alleged to have mental illness before the chancery clerk of the county, and provide for the care and maintenance of those persons by the sheriff of their respective counties after being adjudged as a person with mental illness by the properly constituted authority, when there is no room in one (1) of the state psychiatric hospitals or institutions for the person with mental illness. The boards shall cause all reasonable and proper allowance for that care and maintenance to be paid out of the county treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 308; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3681; 1930, § 238; 1942, § 2916; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 19-5-45.
Construction of sheltered workshop for employment of handicapped.

Any county within the State of Mississippi wherein the railroads known as the Illinois Central and the Mississippi Central intersect, and any county with a population of not less than twenty-one thousand nor more than twenty-one thousand five hundred and with an assessed valuation in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00), and in which State Highway 35 and State Highway 12 intersect, is hereby authorized and empowered to issue the negotiable bonds or certificates of indebtedness of said county for the purpose of constructing an industrial building to be used as a sheltered workshop for the employment of handicapped people, and said county is hereby authorized to retain two mills of the state ad valorem tax levy for a period not in excess of five years for the purpose of assisting in the retirement of said bonds and interest thereon.

The board of supervisors of any county coming within the provisions of this section shall be authorized to levy, at the time and in the prescribed manner other county tax levies are made, an ad valorem tax of one-fourth mill for each mill retained levied against all of the taxable property of such county, and such levy shall be made a condition precedent to the operation of this section.

The amount of bonds or certificates of indebtedness issued for this purpose shall not exceed the sum of One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) and the two mill state ad valorem tax levy herein authorized to be retained for the retirement of said bonds may be pledged, together with the full faith and credit of the county, for the payment of said bonds at maturity and the interest thereon.

In issuing the bonds herein authorized, it shall only be necessary for the board of supervisors of said county to adopt a resolution providing for the sale and issuance of said bonds as now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2996.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 280, § 1, eff June 5, 1964.

§ 19-5-47.
Construction of public health buildings and clinics.

The board of supervisors of any county in the state is hereby empowered, in its discretion, to acquire by gift, donation or purchase necessary real estate on which to erect, construct or reconstruct public health buildings and clinics sponsored by the public health units of any county, or a public health building to house the county health department, said funds to be expended out of the general fund or out of any fund collected from a special levy made by said county for public health purposes. In said construction the board of supervisors of all counties are hereby empowered to erect said buildings in conjunction with any municipality situated in any county or in conjunction with any federal agency, and the board of supervisors is hereby authorized to sponsor any of such said projects, or, in the discretion of said board, said buildings may be constructed under contract after advertising as provided by law and upon competitive bids received therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2997; Laws, 1940, ch. 302; Laws, 1942, ch. 212.

§ 19-5-49.
Lease of county homes and farms.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to lease or rent any lands or buildings owned by the county and being used, or intended to be used, as a county home and farm to any person, persons, or association for the purposes of using such land and buildings for the care and keeping of old, infirm, or indigent persons. At any time that such lands and buildings cease to be used for such purposes, then such lease shall automatically expire.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2997-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 260.

§ 19-5-50.
Controlling running of animals at large; establishing county pounds.

The governing authorities of any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and having within its boundaries two cities having in excess of forty thousand (40,000) population each, according to the 1970 United States decennial census and of any county bordering on the Pearl River having two (2) judicial districts, wherein is housed the seat of state government, wherein U. S. Interstates 55 and 20 interchange and having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the 1970 federal decennial census, shall have the power to prevent or regulate the running at large of animals of all kinds, and to cause such as may be running at large to be impounded and sold to discharge the costs and penalties provided for the violation of such regulations and the expense of impounding and keeping and selling the same; to regulate and provide for the taxing of owners and harborers of dogs, and to destroy dogs running at large, unless such dogs have proper identification indicating that said dogs have been vaccinated for rabies; and to provide for the erection of all needful pens, pounds, and buildings for the use of the county, and to appoint and confirm keepers thereof, and to establish and enforce rules governing the same.

The governing authorities of any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and having within its boundaries two (2) cities having in excess of forty thousand (40,000) population each, according to the 1970 federal decennial census, and of any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and the State of Alabama in which there is a shipyard which constructs oceangoing vessels, and any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and the State of Louisiana and through which U.S. Interstate Highway 10 runs, shall have the power to prevent or regulate the running at large of animals of all kinds, and to cause such as may be running at large to be impounded and sold to discharge the costs and penalties provided for the violation of such regulations and the expense of impounding and keeping and selling the same; to regulate and provide for the taxing of owners and harborers of dogs, and to destroy dogs running at large unless such dogs have proper identification indicating that said dogs have been vaccinated for rabies; and to provide for the erection of all needful pens, pounds and buildings for the use of the county, and to appoint and confirm keepers thereof, and to establish and enforce rules governing the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-153; Laws, 1972, ch. 509, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 560, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1974).

§ 19-5-51.
Bounty on beaver, nutria, and bobcats.

Any board of supervisors may, in its discretion, by appropriate resolution spread upon its minutes, offer a bounty not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for each nutria, beaver or bobcat destroyed, where such board finds and determines that nutria, beaver or bobcats are in such quantities that the preservation of trees and other properties requires such bounties to be offered. Upon presentation to the sheriff of the complete tail of a nutria, beaver or bobcat, the sheriff shall execute a receipt therefor. Upon filing of such receipt with the chancery clerk, the amount of such bounty may be allowed by the board of supervisors as are other accounts against the county.

There is further provided a bounty on beaver not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for each beaver to be paid in the following manner: upon the presentation of the tail of any beaver, any conservation officer of the state shall issue a receipt in such form as prescribed by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks to the person presenting such tail. The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall redeem such receipts by paying to such person a sum not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for each such receipt as bounty. The redemption of such receipts shall be paid only from funds especially appropriated for this purpose and it is expressly provided that no such bounty shall be paid from any regular receipts, funds and appropriations of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

For the purposes of carrying out the purposes of this section, the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the State Forestry Commission are authorized, empowered and directed, when requested by the board of supervisors or any property owner, to utilize funds, personnel and equipment under reasonable terms and conditions.

No bounty shall be paid when funds, personnel or equipment of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the State Forestry Commission or the county are employed in capturing and killing such animals.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2890.2; Laws, 1964, ch. 231, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 569, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 19-5-53.
Promotion of excellence in raising crops and livestock.

The board of supervisors in the various counties of the state are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to appropriate money out of the general county fund for the purpose of offering premiums for excellence in raising crops and livestock in their county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3786; 1930, § 273; 1942, § 2959; Laws, 1910, ch. 144.

§ 19-5-55.
Promotion of excellence in raising crops and livestock; limitation on amount to be expended.

The amount of money to be appropriated and offered shall not exceed the following: (a) for corn – Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for the best five acres or more, One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for the second best and Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for the third best, or half the amounts for three acres; (b) for mule colt – not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for the best, Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) for the second best and Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for the third best; (c) for horse colt – the same as for a mule colt; (d) for cow – not more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for the best, Thirty Dollars ($30.00) for the second best and Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for the third best; (e) for hog – the same as for a cow. Other premiums for excellence in raising agricultural, horticultural and livestock products may be given in proportion. No exhibit or entry of any kind which has once been awarded a prize shall be eligible at any other time for a prize.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3787; 1930, § 274; 1942, § 2960; Laws, 1910, ch. 144.

§ 19-5-57.
Promotion of excellence in raising crops and livestock; petition by contestants; publication of premiums.

Before the board of supervisors will be authorized to take action under Sections 19-5-53, 19-5-55, a petition containing the names of not less than one hundred contestants in the county must be on file in the office of the chancery clerk of the county on or before the first Monday of January, in the year in which the premiums are to be offered. Publications of the premiums must be made on or before the 15th day of February in the year in which they are to be offered.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3788; 1930, § 275; 1942, § 2961; Laws, 1910, ch. 144.

§ 19-5-59.
Promotion of excellence in raising crops and livestock; rules governing contest and placing of exhibits.

The board of supervisors shall have the power to issue rules governing the contest, and to determine the time for placing of the exhibits in competition at the county seat.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 2790; 1930, § 277; 1942, § 2963; Laws, 1910, ch. 144.

§ 19-5-61.
Promotion of excellence in raising crops and livestock; judges.

The board of supervisors shall, after having announced premiums, select a competent committee or judges to measure the land, to test the crop and pass upon the merits of the exhibits and entries. The members of said committee shall not be related to the contestant in any manner, and the members shall have their report ready for the date of meeting at the county seat in the fall on the date named for exhibit and competition by the said board of supervisors. Members of said committee shall receive compensation as determined upon by the board of supervisors, not to exceed Three Dollars ($3.00) per day, while actually employed in the work.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3789; 1930, § 276; 1942, § 2962; Laws, 1910, ch. 144.